California statutes. Insurance Code
(D) Such time as may be specified in the bylaws, not to exceed 11 months.

(13) The interindemnity arrangement, and the reserve trust fund incident thereto, shall be subject to termination at any time by the vote or written consent of not less than three-fourths of the participating members.

(c) The board of trustees shall cause to be recorded with the office of the county recorder of the county of the principal place of business of the interindemnity arrangement within 90 days following the end of each fiscal year, a written statement, executed by a majority of the board of trustees under penalty of perjury, reciting that each member participating in the interindemnity arrangement was mailed a copy of the annual financial statement and quarterly audit certificates by first-class mail, postage prepaid, required pursuant to paragraph (8) of subdivision (a).

(d) Each person solicited to become a participating member in an interindemnity arrangement shall receive in writing, at least 48 hours prior to the execution by the prospective participating member of the trust agreement, and at least 48 hours prior to the payment by the prospective participating member of any consideration in connection with the interindemnity arrangement, the following information:

(1) A copy of the articles of incorporation and bylaws of the cooperative corporation and a copy of the form of trust agreement to be executed by the prospective participating member.

(2) A disclosure statement regarding the interindemnity arrangement. The disclosure statement shall contain on the first or cover page a legend in boldface type reading substantially as follows:

“THE INTERINDEMNITY ARRANGEMENT CONTEMPLATED HEREIN PROVIDES THAT PARTICIPATING MEMBERS HAVE UNLIMITED PERSONAL LIABILITY FOR ASSESSMENTS THAT MAY BE LEVIED TO PAY FOR THE PROFESSIONAL NEGLIGENCE OR OTHER LIABILITY AUTHORIZED BY THIS SECTION. NO ASSURANCES CAN BE GIVEN REGARDING THE AMOUNT OR FREQUENCY OF ASSESSMENTS WHICH MAY BE LEVIED, OR THAT ALL PARTICIPATING MEMBERS WILL MAKE TIMELY PAYMENT OF THEIR ASSESSMENTS TO COVER THE PROFESSIONAL NEGLIGENCE OR OTHER LIABILITY AUTHORIZED BY THIS SECTION.”

(3) The disclosure statement shall further contain all of the following information:

(A) The amount, nature, and terms and conditions of the professional negligence or other liability relating to a member’s professional
 practice coverage available under the interindemnity arrangement.

(B) The amount of the initial contribution required of each participating member and a statement of the minimum number of members and aggregate contributions required for the interindemnity arrangement to commence.

(C) The names, addresses, and professional experience of each member of the board of trustees.

(D) The requirements for admission as a participating member.

(E) A statement of the services to be provided under the interindemnity arrangement to each participating member.

(F) A statement regarding the obligation of each member
 to pay assessments and the consequences for failure to do so.

(G) A statement of the rights and obligations of a participating member in the event the member dies, retires, becomes disabled, or terminates participation for any reason, or the interindemnity arrangement terminates for any reason.

(H) A statement regarding the services to be provided, indicating whether these services will be delegated to others pursuant to a contractual arrangement. For those services delegated to others pursuant to a contractual arrangement, a statement fully disclosing and itemizing all consideration received directly or indirectly under the arrangement, and indicating what the consideration is for, and how, when, and to whom the consideration will be paid.

(I) A statement of the voting rights of the members and the circumstances under which participation of a member may be terminated and under which the interindemnity arrangement may be terminated.

(J) If any statement of estimated or projected financial information for the interindemnity arrangement is used, a statement of the estimation or projection and a summary of the data and assumptions upon which it is based.

(4) A list with the names and addresses of current participating members of the interindemnity arrangement.

(e) No officer, director, trustee, employee, or member of the interindemnity arrangement or the cooperative corporation shall receive, or be entitled to receive, any payment, bonus, salary, income,
 compensation, or other benefit whatsoever, either from the reserve trust fund or the income therefrom or from any other funds of the interindemnity arrangement or the members thereof based on the number of participating members, or the amount of the reserve trust fund or other funds of the interindemnity arrangement.

(f) A peer review committee or committees shall be established by the trust agreement to review the qualifications of any physician and surgeon to participate or continue to participate in the interindemnity arrangement, and to review the quality of medical services rendered by any participating member, as well as the validity of medical malpractice claims made against participating members. Any physician and surgeon, prior to becoming a participating member of the interindemnity arrangement, shall be reviewed and
 approved by a majority of the members of the peer review committee. No peer review committee, or any of its members, shall be liable for any action taken by the committee in reviewing the qualifications of a physician and surgeon to participate or continue to participate, or the quality of medical services rendered, or the validity of a medical malpractice claim, unless it is alleged and proved that the action was taken with actual malice.

(g) The following are hereby defined as unfair methods of competition and deceptive acts or practices with respect to cooperative corporations or interindemnity arrangements provided for in this section:

(1) Making any false or misleading statement as to, or issuing, circulating, or causing to be made, issued, or circulated, any estimate,
 illustration, circular, or statement misrepresenting the terms of any interindemnity arrangement or the benefits or advantages promised thereby, or making any misleading representation or any misrepresentation as to the financial condition of the interindemnity arrangement, or making any misrepresentation to any participating member for the purpose of inducing or tending to induce the member to lapse, forfeit, or surrender their rights to indemnification under the interindemnity arrangement. It shall be a false or misleading statement to state or represent that a cooperative corporation or interindemnity arrangement is or constitutes “insurance” or an “insurance company” or an “insurance policy.”

(2) Making or disseminating or causing to be made or disseminated before the public in this state, in any newspaper or other publication, or
 any advertising device, or by public outcry or proclamation, or in any other manner or means whatsoever, any statement containing any assertion, representation, or statement with respect to those cooperative corporations or interindemnity arrangements, or with respect to any person in the conduct of those cooperative corporations or interindemnity arrangements, which is untrue, deceptive, or misleading, and which is known, or which by the exercise of reasonable care should be known, to be untrue, deceptive, or misleading. It shall be a false or misleading statement to state or represent that a cooperative corporation or interindemnity arrangement is or constitutes “insurance” or an “insurance company” or an “insurance policy.”

(3) Entering into any agreement to commit, or by any concerted action committing, any act of boycott, coercion, or
 intimidation resulting in or tending to result in an unreasonable restraint of, or monopoly in, those cooperative corporations or interindemnity arrangements.

(4) Filing with any supervisory or other public official, or making, publishing, disseminating, circulating, or delivering to any person, or placing before the public, or causing directly or indirectly, to be made, published, disseminated, circulated, or delivered to any person, or placed before the public any false statement of financial condition of a cooperative corporation or interindemnity arrangement with intent to deceive.

(5) Making any false entry in any book, report, or statement of a cooperative corporation or interindemnity arrangement with intent to deceive any agent or examiner lawfully appointed to examine
 into its condition or into any of its affairs, or any public official to whom a cooperative corporation or interindemnity arrangement is required by law to report, or who has authority by law to examine into its condition or into any of its affairs, or, with like intent, willfully omitting to make a true entry of any material fact pertaining to a cooperative corporation or interindemnity arrangement in any book, report, or statement of a cooperative corporation or interindemnity arrangement.

(6) Making or disseminating, or causing to be made or disseminated, before the public in this state, in any newspaper or other publication, or any other advertising device, or by public outcry or proclamation, or in any other manner or means whatsoever, whether directly or by implication, any statement that a cooperative corporation or interindemnity
 arrangement is a member of the California Insurance Guarantee Association, or insured against insolvency as defined in Section 119.5. This paragraph shall not be interpreted to prohibit any activity of the California Insurance Guarantee Association or of the commissioner authorized, directly or by implication, by Article 14.2 (commencing with Section 1063) of Chapter 1.

(7) Knowingly committing or performing with a frequency as to indicate a general business practice any of the following unfair claims settlement practices:

(A) Misrepresenting to claimants pertinent facts or provisions relating to any coverage at issue.

(B) Failing to acknowledge and act promptly upon communications with respect to claims arising
 under those interindemnity arrangements.

(C) Failing to adopt and implement reasonable standards for the prompt investigation and processing of claims arising under those interindemnity arrangements.

(D) Failing to affirm or deny coverage of claims within a reasonable time after proof of claim requirements have been completed and submitted by the participating member.

(E) Not attempting in good faith to effectuate prompt, fair, and equitable settlements of claims in which liability has become reasonably clear.

(F) Compelling participating members to institute litigation to recover amounts due under an interindemnity arrangement by offering substantially
 less than the amounts ultimately recovered in actions brought by those participating members when those participating members have made claims under those interindemnity arrangements for amounts reasonably similar to the amounts ultimately recovered.

(G) Attempting to settle a claim by a participating member for less than the amount to which a reasonable person would have believed they were entitled by reference to written or printed advertising material accompanying or made part of an application for membership in an interindemnity arrangement.

(H) Attempting to settle claims on the basis of an interindemnity arrangement that was altered without notice to the participating
 member.

(I) Failing, after payment of a claim, to inform participating members, upon request by them, of the coverage under which payment has been made.

(J) Making known to claimants a practice of the cooperative corporation or interindemnity arrangement of appealing from arbitration awards in favor of claimants for the purpose of compelling them to accept settlements or compromises less than the amount awarded in arbitration.

(K) Delaying the investigation or payment of claims by requiring a claimant, or their physician, to submit a preliminary claim report, and then requiring the subsequent submission of formal proof of loss forms, both of which submissions contain substantially the same
 information.

(L) Failing to settle claims promptly, where liability has become apparent, under one portion of an interindemnity arrangement in order to influence settlements under other portions of the interindemnity arrangement.

(M) Failing to provide promptly a reasonable explanation of the basis relied on in the interindemnity arrangement, in relation to the facts of applicable law, for the denial of a claim or for the offer of a compromise settlement.

(N) Directly advising a claimant not to obtain the services of an attorney.

(O) Misleading a claimant as to the applicable statute of limitations.

(h) Notwithstanding any contrary provisions of Part 2 (commencing with Section 12200) of Division 3 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code, it shall not be necessary to hold a meeting of members of the cooperative corporation for the purpose of electing directors if the bylaws provide the election may be held by first-class mail balloting or balloting by electronic transmission. First-class mail balloting or balloting by electronic transmission may also be used in conjunction with a meeting at which directors are to be elected and all mail and electronic ballots shall count toward establishing a quorum for the meeting for the limited purpose of the issues set forth in the mail and electronic ballot. Directors shall be elected as follows:

(1) The candidates receiving the highest number of votes, up to the number of directors to be
 elected, by a specified date at least 45 days but not later than 60 days after the ballots are first mailed, postage prepaid, to the members (or the date of a meeting of members held in conjunction therewith) shall be elected.

(2) In the event that no candidate receives a majority of the votes cast for a vacant office, a runoff election shall be held between the two candidates receiving the highest number of votes cast. The runoff election shall be held at least 45 days but not more than 60 days after the ballots for the election are mailed, postage prepaid. In the event that there is more than one office for which no candidate receives a majority of the votes cast, the candidates for the runoff shall be twice the number of vacant offices, and shall be those persons who received the highest number of votes therefor.

A record of the mail and electronic ballots shall be kept on file for a period of three months after all vacant board positions have been filled, and shall be subject to inspection at any reasonable time by any members of the cooperative corporation.

(i) No officer, director, trustee, or member of the interindemnity arrangement or the cooperative corporation, or any entity in which that person has a material financial interest, shall enter into or renew any transaction or contract with the trust unless the material facts as to the transaction or contract and as to the interest of the person are fully disclosed to the participating members, and the transaction or contract is approved by an affirmative vote of at least 75 percent of the membership present at a meeting, in person or by proxy. If any
 transaction or contract is to be submitted to members at a properly called meeting, the membership shall be notified of the meeting and of the transaction or contract by first-class mail, postage prepaid, or by electronic transmission at least 45 days prior to the meeting.

(j) Services provided to the trust pursuant to a delegated contractual arrangement shall be embodied in a written contract. Each written contract shall provide for reasonable consideration to the parties. In addition, each written contract shall be disclosed annually to participating members in a disclosure report containing the information described in subparagraph (H) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (d). The disclosure report shall be sent to participating members by first-class mail, postage prepaid, or by electronic transmission, and shall be sent separately from any statements,
 records, or other documents. The disclosure requirements of this subdivision shall apply to all existing and future written contracts.

(k) Upon request of the Commissioner of Financial Protection and Innovation, an interindemnity arrangement shall immediately forward to the commissioner a current list of participating members, including the names, addresses, and telephone numbers of those members.

(l) Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary, whenever the membership of a cooperative organization, organized pursuant to Part 2 (commencing with Section 12200) of Division 3 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code and consisting solely of physicians and surgeons licensed in this state amounts to 2,000 or more members and the trust fund is at least forty million dollars
 ($40,000,000), which is available to the public for malpractice claims or other claims authorized by this section, the cooperative is authorized to admit members without a contribution to that trust fund if assessments are charged to each of those members within the first 50 months in an amount equal to the amount of the contribution to the reserve fund that would otherwise be required.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 204, Sec. 8.   (AB 1140)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

1281.

Reciprocal or interinsurance contracts, the exchange thereof, the subscribers, attorneys in fact, agents, and representatives, and all matters incident to or concerned with such contracts and relationship, shall be subject to and regulated by all of the provisions of this code, whether or not such provisions specifically refer to reciprocals or interinsurance exchanges, except as otherwise exempted in this chapter.

When any provision of this code, other than in this chapter, is made applicable to reciprocal insurers, such provision shall be construed in accordance with the fundamental nature of a reciprocal insurer. In the event of
 any direct conflicts between such other law and the provisions of this chapter, the latter shall prevail. Such other law may, however, be used to supplement or explain the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 341.)
-------------------------------------------

1282.

(a) The following provisions of this code shall not be applicable to reciprocal or interinsurance exchanges and their contracts, subscribers, attorneys in fact, agents, and representatives, unless such provisions are referred to and specifically made applicable or incorporated by reference by other portions of this code, and, in such event, such provisions shall be applicable only to the extent required by such reference or incorporation:

(1) Sections 700.01, 700.02, 700.03, and 700.04;

(2) Sections 707, 708,
 709, 710, and 711;

(3) Section 760.5;

(4) Sections 984, 986, and 987 of Article 13 (commencing with Section 980) of Chapter 1, Part 2, Division 1, relating to insolvency;

(5) Sections 1044, 1045, and 1047;

(6) Sections 1104.2, 1104.3, 1104.4, 1104.5, 1104.6, 1104.7, and 1104.8, except with respect to incorporated attorneys in fact;

(7) Section 1140;

(8) Section 1140.5, except with respect to incorporated attorneys in fact;

(9) Section 1152;

(10) Sections 1153, 1153.5, and 1154;

(11) Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 1160.1) of Chapter 2, Part 2, Division 1, relating to life insurer investments in housing projects;

(12) Section 1194.8;

(13) Article 5 (commencing with Section 1220) of Chapter 2, Part 2, Division 1, relating to investments in loans on life insurance policies;

(14) Article 2 (commencing with Section 1580) of Chapter 4, Part 2, Division 1, relating to alien insurers;

(15) Article 3 (commencing with Section 1600) of Chapter 4, Part 2, Division 1, relating to agent for service of process;

(16) Article 16 (commencing with Section 1758.1) of Chapter 5, Part 2, Division 1, relating to
 variable contract agents;

(17) Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 1760) of Part 2, Division 1, relating to surplus line brokers;

(18) Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 1831) of Part 2, Division 1, relating to life insurance analysts;

(19) Articles 1 (commencing with Section 3010) and 2 (commencing with Section 3030) of Chapter 3, Part 1, Division 2, relating to incorporated fire and marine insurers;

(20) Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 4010) of Part 1, Division 2, relating to general mutual insurers;

(21) Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 5050) of Part 1, Division 2, relating to county mutual fire insurers;

(22) Chapter
 6 (commencing with Section 7080) of Part 1, Division 2, relating to county mutual fire reinsurers;

(23) Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 9080) of Part 1, Division 2, relating to fraternal fire insurers;

(24) Articles 3 (commencing with Section 10150) and 3a (commencing with Section 10159.1) of Chapter 1, Part 2, Division 2, relating to life insurance policies;

(25) Sections 10170, 10171, 10172, and 10173, relating to payment and proceeds of life insurance policies;

(26) Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 10200) of Part 2, Division 2, relating to group life policies;

(27) Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 10220) of Part 2, Division 2, relating to blanket life policies;

(28) Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 10240) of Part 2, Division 2, relating to burial contracts;

(29) Sections 10430, 10431, 10432, and 10433, relating to restrictions on business of life insurers;

(30) Articles 1a (commencing with Section 10440), 2 (commencing with Section 10450), 3 (commencing with Section 10478), 3a (commencing with Section 10489.1), 4 (commencing with Section 10490), and 5 (commencing with Section 10506) of Chapter 5, Part 2, Division 2, relating to internal affairs of mutual insurers, registration and valuation of life policies, standard valuation law, exempt societies, pension funds and separate accounts;

(31) Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 10510) of Part 2, Divison 2, relating to incorporated life insurers issuing policies on
 a reserve basis;

(32) Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 10970) of Part 2, Division 2, relating to fraternal benefit societies;

(33) Chapter 10A (commencing with Section 11400) of Part 2, Division 2, relating to firemen’s, policemen’s, or peace officers’ benefit and relief associations;

(34) Chapter 11 (commencing with Section 11420) of Part 2, Division 2, relating to change by assessment plan life insurers to reserve plan;

(35) Chapter 11A (commencing with Section 11491) of Part 2, Division 2, relating to nonprofit hospital service plans;

(36) Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 11520) of Part 2, Division 2, relating to grants and annuities societies;

(37) Chapter 13 (commencing with Section 11525) of Part 2, Division 2, relating to voluntary mutualization of certain incorporated insurers;

(38) Article 3 (commencing with Section 11600), of Chapter 1, Part 3, Division 2, relating to capital requirements of incorporated insurers;

(39) Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 11770) of Part 3, Division 2, relating to the State Compensation Insurance Fund;

(40) Sections 12050, 12051, 12052, and 12110, relating to incorporated surety insurers;

(41) Part 5 (commencing with Section 12140) of Division 2, relating to motor clubs;

(42) Part 6 (commencing with Section 12340) of Division 2,
 relating to insurance covering land, but not including Sections 12640.19, 12660, and 12661.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 209, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1283.

The provisions of Part 7, Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code shall be applicable to reciprocal or interinsurance exchanges.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 112.)
-------------------------------------------

1284.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter or of this code, any reciprocal or interinsurance exchange which meets all of the conditions of this section shall be exempted from all reserve requirements of this code to which it would otherwise be subject:

(a) The subscribers are comprised of a local hospital district formed pursuant to Division 23 (commencing with Section 32000) of the Health and Safety Code and the individual participating members of its attending medical staff, or any hospital (as defined in Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code) and the individual participating members of its
 attending medical staff. As used in this section, “attending medical staff” refers to licensed physicians and surgeons, podiatrists, and dentists who have hospital privileges at any hospital and not to interns or residents who are employees of such hospital.

(b) The physicians and surgeons on the attending medical staff are independent contractors, whether individually, through professional corporations, or through partnership or clinic arrangements, and the creation of the reciprocal or interinsurance exchange will not affect the prerogatives of such physicians and surgeons in accepting patients, charging fees, or similar issues in the management of a medical practice. This subdivision shall not be construed to limit the authority of a peer review committee to impose such restrictions on the staff privileges of a participating member of the attending medical staff as deemed warranted by the peer review procedure and medical audit methods
 provided by subdivision (h).

(c) The initial capitalization for the reciprocal or interinsurance exchange specified in subdivisions (d), (e), and (f) shall be equivalent to the total professional and comprehensive general patient liability losses paid by the hospital and its participating medical staff members during the 10 calendar years immediately preceding the year in which the application for the organizational permit is filed. For the medical staff, “total professional and comprehensive general patient liability losses” shall include all losses paid by the participating medical staff members, whether based on their practice in the hospital or outside the hospital. Such combined total shall be funded or secured by equal contributions from the hospital and, collectively, the individual participating members of its attending medical staff. Such funds shall be used to pay for the losses incurred for awards, settlements, and legal fees
 relating to alleged acts of medical malpractice committed by the hospital or any or all of its participating medical staff members, whether committed in or out of the hospital, and for the operational costs of the reciprocal or interinsurance exchange. Upon determination of the aggregate paid professional and comprehensive general patient liability claims of the preceding 10 years by a survey, such paid claims shall be categorized as provided by subdivisions (d) and (e). In the case of a hospital which has been in existence for less than 10 years, or which has substantially expanded its facilities over the preceding 10 years, or which has paid for no professional liability losses during the preceding 10 years, the commissioner may establish such capitalization requirements as he deems necessary and proper as compared to the amounts specified in subdivisions (d) and (e).

(d) A primary medical liability risk fund shall be maintained in an amount
 at least equivalent to the aggregate dollar amount of paid incident claims of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) or less per each incident for both the hospital and the participating members of the attending medical staff as provided by subdivision (c).

(e) A catastrophic medical liability risk fund shall be maintained in an amount at least equivalent to the aggregate dollar amount of paid incident claims in excess of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) per incident for both the hospital and the participating members of the attending medical staff as provided in subdivision (c). These funds shall be either (1) deposited as cash or secured by letters of credit, certificates of deposit or promissory notes, or (2) be obtained through an executed and delivered loan commitment with a duration of at least one year by a banking institution qualified to do business in California or other forms of credit or assets readily convertible to cash to
 meet liabilities of the reciprocal or interinsurance exchange organized pursuant to this section. 

(f) All funds or assets collected by a reciprocal or interinsurance exchange established under this section and maintained in a form as set forth in subdivisions (d) and (e) shall be admitted assets valued at face value and be held in accordance with Section 1370 of the Insurance Code, except that a credit commitment shall not be considered an admitted asset for the purpose of regulating investment of assets.

(g) The reciprocal or interinsurance exchange may seek from a licensed insurer, or secure in accordance with Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 1760) of Part 2 of Division 1, excess risk coverage for amounts above the self-retention limit of subdivisions (c), (d), and (e). The hospital and the individual members of the attending medical staff shall have unlimited several
 liability pursuant to Section 1395 to contribute to any liability not covered by such excess risk coverage insurance. Such liability shall be based upon each subscriber’s share of the total liability of the reciprocal or interinsurance exchange as determined by a formula adopted by its board of directors. In the event that a subscriber fails to pay any portion of an assessment, then, without releasing the defaulting subscriber from any obligation to the reciprocal or interinsurance exchange, the remaining subscribers shall be charged with the unpaid assessment in accordance with the adopted formula.

(h) The amounts specified in subdivisions (d), and (e) shall be available in the aggregate to meet the professional and comprehensive general patient liabilities of the hospital and the participating members of the attending medical staff, and shall be replenished annually, or more frequently, if necessary, to an amount equivalent to that specified
 in subdivision (c) or (q), whichever is greater. Such total shall be maintained by a ratio of contributions annually determined by the governing board of the reciprocal or interinsurance exchange as fair, just and reasonable between the hospital and the participating members of the attending medical staff. Assessments may be required as determined to be necessary by the governing board and shall be due within 60 days of notice thereof. Failure to pay such assessments when due shall constitute grounds for termination of policy benefits or coverage.

(i) Any member of the attending medical staff participating in the program shall, as a condition of such participation, be subject to an extensive peer review procedure and a medical audit method of documenting the quality of medical care.

(j) Any system of rating or assessing individual participating members of the attending medical
 staff on the basis of their respective risk exposure shall be fair, just and reasonable.

(k) A promissory note, for the purposes of subdivision (e), shall be secured, and such security shall be perfected, by real or personal property having a market value one and one-half times the face value of the note.

(l) “Hospital,” as used in this section, shall also include any two or more hospitals when either of the following conditions is met:

(i) They are governed by the same hospital district; or

(ii) Where there is a medical staff subject to a unified medical audit and peer review procedure.

(m) Any reciprocal or interinsurance exchange which meets all of the conditions of this section
 shall be exempt from the California Insurance Guarantee Association established pursuant to Article 14.2 (commencing with Section 1063) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 1.

(n) For the purposes of Section 985, minimum capitalization shall be either the initial capitalization as provided in subdivision (c) or the minimum capitalization required by subdivision (q), whichever is greater.

(o) In the event that the reciprocal or interinsurance exchange has reasonable cause to believe that its minimum capitalization may be impaired by current liabilities, including reported claims, it shall issue within 30 days to its subscribers notices of assessments in amounts sufficient to cure the impairment. Within 30 days of such notice the subscribers shall pay the assessment or present forms of indebtedness as provided by subdivision (e), except that with regard to a promissory note issued by
 a person or entity other than a banking institution qualified to do business in California, such note shall be secured by assets sufficient to assure payment of the debt should a default occur.

(p) Any notice of assessment issued pursuant to this section shall be considered an admitted asset at face value and reported as such for the purpose of determining solvency under Section 985.

(q) Minimum capitalization of a reciprocal or interinsurance exchange organized and conducted pursuant to this section shall be determined annually. For the first year following issuance of a certificate of authority, the minimum capitalization shall be that specified in subdivision (c). Each year thereafter, the reciprocal or interinsurance exchange shall conduct a new survey of its subscribers to reestablish their total professional and comprehensive patient liability loss history as provided by
 subdivision (r). If such recalculation of such history discloses total losses exceeding the existing minimum capitalization by 20 percent, the minimum capitalization shall be increased to the amount of such new loss history within six months. Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to preclude the reciprocal or interinsurance exchange from capitalizing at a level exceeding the minimum capitalization required by this section.

(r) The survey of subscribers which establishes total and comprehensive general patient loss liability history shall be annually recalculated to reflect the following:

(1) All such losses paid by, or on behalf of, the hospital for the immediately preceding 10 years;

(2) All such losses paid by, or on behalf of, participating individual members for the immediately preceding 10-calendar-year
 period during which they held staff privileges at the subscriber hospital; and

(3) All such losses paid by, or on behalf of, participating individual members of the attending medical staff during any portion of the immediately preceding five-calendar-year period in which they were not members of the subscriber hospital staff.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 904.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Organization of Exchange [1300. - 1315.]

1300.

Any persons may exchange reciprocal or interinsurance contracts with one another providing insurance, other than life, title, mortgage, mortgage guaranty, or insolvency insurance, among themselves against any loss which may be insured against under other provisions of law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 341.)
-------------------------------------------

1301.

Such persons are termed subscribers.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

1302.

Any domestic corporation, in addition to the rights, powers and franchises specified in its articles of incorporation, has full power and authority to enter into insurance contracts of the kind and character mentioned in this chapter. The right to enter into such contracts is incidental to the purposes for which such corporations are organized and as fully granted as the rights and powers expressly conferred.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

1303.

The organization under which such subscribers so exchange contracts is termed a reciprocal or interinsurance exchange, and shall be deemed the insurer while each subscriber shall be deemed an insured.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1649.)
-------------------------------------------

1305.

Such contracts may be executed by an attorney-in-fact, agent or other representative duly authorized and acting for such subscribers under powers of attorney. Such authorized person is termed the attorney, and may be a corporation.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

1306.

The principal office of the attorney shall be maintained at a place designated by the subscribers in the power of attorney.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

1307.

The power of attorney and contracts made thereunder may:

(a) Provide for the right of substitution of attorney and revocation of the contract or power.

(b) Impose such restrictions upon the exercise of the power as are agreed upon by the subscribers.

(c) Provide for and limit the maximum amount to be paid by subscribers, except that contracts of exchanges writing either liability or workers’ compensation insurance shall be subject to the provisions of Article 6 of this chapter.

(d) Provide for the exercise of any right reserved to the subscribers directly or through a board or other body.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 231, Sec. 6.   (AB 2045)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

1308.

The body exercising the subscribers’ rights shall be selected under such rules as the subscribers adopt. It shall supervise the finances of the exchange and shall supervise its operations to such extent as to assure conformity with the subscriber’s agreement and power of attorney.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

1309.

Such body shall have authority to procure the audit of the accounts and records of the exchange and of the attorney-in-fact, at the expense of the exchange.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

1310.

Such body shall be composed of subscribers or agents of subscribers. Not more than one-third of the members serving on such body shall be agents, employees or shareholders of the attorney.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

1310.1.

The board of a reciprocal or interinsurance exchange operating pursuant to Section 1284 shall be composed of members of the governing board of the hospital, the participating members of its attending medical staff, and health care consumers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1465.)
-------------------------------------------

1311.

A reciprocal or interinsurance exchange may engage in the surety insurance business in this state only provided its surplus is at least twice the amount required as paid-in capital of an incorporated insurer writing the same classes of insurance by the provisions of Section 700.01. Paid-in capital as used in this section shall not include any of the surplus amounts required of incorporated insurers by the provisions of Sections 700.02, 700.03 and 700.05 of this code.

Any such reciprocal or interinsurance exchange shall be subject to such of the provisions of Chapter 1, except Sections 12050, 12051, and 12052, Part 4, Division 2, as can be made applicable to the nature of a reciprocal or interinsurance exchange.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 341.)
-------------------------------------------

1312.

(a) Any reciprocal or interinsurance exchange, domestic or foreign, which has obtained a certificate of capability to reinsure or a favorable order under Section 1401.5 and whose subscribers by such order have no liability for assessment, may accept reinsurance of risks for all classes of insurance which it writes in California including the class in which such reinsurance is to be accepted.